Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2701.11
Delivery charges,
defined.

Delivery charges means charges by the
seller of personal property or services for preparation and delivery to a
location designated by the purchaser of personal property or services, including,
but not limited to, transportation, shipping, postage, handling, crating,
and packing. Delivery charges
does not include United States postage charges on direct mail that are separately
stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser.

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 15;

Laws 2014, LB867, § 10.